Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [142B.665] CHILD CARE CENTER ACCESS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) The following terms have the meanings given for the purposes of this section. new text end new text begin (b) "Child care center" means: new text end new text begin (1) a child care center licensed under chapter 142B and Minnesota Rules, chapter 9503; and new text end new text begin (2) a certified license-exempt child care center authorized under chapter 142C. new text end new text begin (c) "Employee" means the license holder, authorized agent, controlling individual, director, staff persons, substitutes, and unsupervised volunteers of a licensed child care center or a certified license-exempt child care center. new text end new text begin (d) "Judicial officer" means a judge or justice of the United States, a United States magistrate judge, or a clerk of the court authorized to sign a warrant pursuant to rule 9 of the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Limits on access by officials engaged in immigration enforcement. new text end new text begin (a) An employee of a child care center must not consent to a federal, state, or local official entering a child care center for the purposes of civil immigration enforcement unless the official provides the employee with a warrant signed by a judicial officer. The employee must request that the federal, state, or local official provide valid identification and a written statement of purpose. new text end new text begin (b) If a federal, state, or local official engaged in civil immigration enforcement enters a child care center, an on-duty employee must immediately notify the child care center license holder or authorized agent. new text end new text begin (c) This section does not prohibit entry to a child care center by a state, federal, or local official administering a state or federally supported child care program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end